Maryland, session 2025, SB0646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–142.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) (i) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” means a protocol established
by an insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance organization that
requires a prescription drug or sequence of prescription drugs to be used by an insured or
an enrollee before a prescription drug ordered by a prescriber for the insured or the enrollee
is covered.
(ii) “Step therapy or fail–first protocol” includes a protocol that
meets the definition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph regardless of the name, label,
or terminology used by the insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or health maintenance
organization to identify the protocol.
– 1 –

Ch. 689 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) This section applies to:
(i) insurers and nonprofit health service plans that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups on an expense–incurred basis under
health insurance policies or contracts that are issued or delivered in the State; and
(ii) health maintenance organizations that provide hospital,
medical, or surgical benefits to individuals or groups under contracts that are issued or
delivered in the State.
(2) An insurer, a nonprofit health service plan, or a health maintenance
organization that provides coverage for prescription drugs through a pharmacy benefits
manager is subject to the requirements of this section.
(e) An entity subject to this section may not impose a step therapy or fail–first
protocol on an insured or an enrollee for a prescription drug approved by the U.S. Food and
Drug Administration if:
(1) (I) the prescription drug is used to treat the insured’s or enrollee’s
stage four advanced metastatic cancer; and
[(2)] (II) use of the prescription drug is:
[(i)] 1. consistent with the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration–approved indication or the National Comprehensive Cancer Network
Drugs & Biologics Compendium indication for the treatment of stage four advanced
metastatic cancer; and
[(ii)] 2. supported by peer–reviewed medical literature; OR
(2) THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG IS:
(I) INSULIN OR AN INSULIN ANALOG USED TO TREAT THE
INSURED’S OR ENROLLEE’S TYPE 1, TYPE 2, OR GESTATIONAL DIABETES; AND
(II) 1. INSULIN; OR
2. AN INSULIN ANALOG OR OTHER PRESCRIPTION DRUG
THAT PERFORMS A SIMILAR FUNCTION TO INSULIN, REGARDLESS OF THE
ACTIVATION PERIOD, WHETHER THE SOLUTION IS MIXED BEFORE OR AFTER
DISPENSING, OR WHETHER THE DRUG IS ADMINISTERED BY INJECTION OR
INHALATION.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 689
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –